District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

31-811

Representatives of fraternal benefit societies.

Repealed.

History

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-227, § 12, 44 DCR 140
Mar. 27, 2003, D.C. Law 14-264, § 20, 50 DCR 260

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-1331.